Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1541.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of July 9, 1970 (P.L.484, No.164), entitled "An act relating to indemnification agreements between architects, engineers or surveyors and owners, contractors, subcontractors or suppliers and indemnification agreements relating to snow removal or ice control services," is amended to read:AN ACTRelating to indemnification agreements between architects, engineers or surveyors and owners, contractors, subcontractors or suppliers [and], indemnification agreements <--1234567891011121314151617181920 relating to snow removal or ice control services[.] and indemnification agreements relating to construction contracts.Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections A SECTION to read:Section 1.2. The following apply to provisions or terms in a construction contract which are void and unenforceable:(1) A provision or term in a construction contract in which a party AN INDEMNITEE shall be indemnified, held harmless or insured for damages, claims, losses or expenses arising out of bodily injury to persons, damage to property or economic damage caused by or resulting from the party's INDEMNITEE'S negligence, in whole or in part, shall be void as against public policy and unenforceable.(2) As used in this section:(i) The term "construction contract" means a covenant, agreement or understanding in, or in connection with, a contract or agreement made and entered into by a party relative to the design, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, maintenance, demolition, servicing or security of a building, structure, highway, railroad, appurtenance, land development or appliance.(ii) The term "party" means an owner, contractor, subcontractor, supplier, architect, engineer or land surveyor, or an agent or employe of an owner, contractor, subcontractor, supplier, architect, engineer or land surveyor.Section 1.3. The following apply to insurance coverage for an additional insured:(1) If a construction contract requires insurance coverage to be provided to an additional insured and the additional 20250HB1541PN2873 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insured is added to the relevant general liability insurance policy prior to any loss involving the additional insured, the insurance coverage afforded to the additional insured shall not be broader than that which is required by the construction contract to provide for the additional insured.(2) The insurance coverage afforded to an additional insured in a construction contract shall only apply to the extent permitted by law.(3) As used in this section:(i) The term "additional insured" means an individual or entity that is added to a general liability insurance policy to extend coverage beyond the named insured to the individual or entity.(ii) The term "construction contract" means as defined in section 1.2(2)(i).(I) THE TERM "CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT" MEANS A COVENANT, PROMISE, AGREEMENT OR UNDERSTANDING IN, OR IN CONNECTION WITH OR COLLATERAL TO, A CONTRACT, AGREEMENT OR PURCHASE ORDER, RELATIVE TO THE CONSTRUCTION, ALTERATION, REPAIR, MAINTENANCE, SERVICING OR SECURITY OF A BUILDING, STRUCTURE, HIGHWAY, RAILROAD, APPURTENANCE OR APPLIANCE, INCLUDING MOVING, DEMOLITION, EXCAVATING, GRADING, CLEARING, SITE PREPARATION OR DEVELOPMENT OF REAL PROPERTY CONNECTED THEREWITH, PURPORTING TO INDEMNIFY OR HOLD HARMLESS THE INDEMNITEE AGAINST LIABILITY FOR DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF BODILY INJURY TO PERSONS OR DAMAGE TO PROPERTY CAUSED BY OR RESULTING FROM THE NEGLIGENCE, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, OF THE INDEMNITEE.(II) THE TERM "INDEMNITEE" MEANS AN OWNER, GENERAL CONTRACTOR OR AGENT OR EMPLOYE OF AN OWNER OR GENERAL CONTRACTOR THAT PRESENTS A PROVISION OR TERM IN A CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT FOR 20250HB1541PN2873 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INDEMNIFICATION.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1541PN2873 - 4 - 12